California, session 20252026, AB1571.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 116023 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:116023. For purposes of this article, “wearable personal flotation device” means a lifejacket, swim vest, water wings, or other flotation device designed to be worn or attached to the body of an infant or child.